test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pwwzw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pȭzõ: # Noun 118 'eng /est põõsas/fin' - full paradigm
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Nom: pȭzõ
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Gen: pȭzõ
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Par: pȭzõ
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Dat: pȭzõn
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ins: pȭzõks
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ill: [pȭzõz, pȭzõ]
     pȭzõ+N+Sg+Ela: pȭzõst
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Nom: pȭzõd
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Gen: pȭzõd
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Par: pȭzidi
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Dat: pȭzõdõn
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ins: pȭzõdõks
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ill: pȭziž
     pȭzõ+N+Pl+Ela: pȭzist
